fi: Helmilangan säikeiden lukumäärä: 1-säikeinen; 19-säikeinen; 21-säikeinen; 24-säikeinen; 3-säikeinen; 30-säikeinen; 49-säikeinen; 60-säikeinen; 7-säikeinen; Muu
vi: Số lượng sợi dây xâu hạt: 1 sợi; 19 sợi; 21 sợi; 24 sợi; 3 sợi; 30 sợi; 49 sợi; 60 sợi; 7 sợi; Khác
fr: Nombre de brins du fil métallique de perlage: 1 brin; 19 brins; 21 brins; 24 brins; 3 brins; 30 brins; 49 brins; 60 brins; 7 brins; Autre
da: Antal tråde i perletråd: 1 tråd; 19 tråde; 21 tråde; 24 tråde; 3 tråde; 30 tråde; 49 tråde; 60 tråde; 7 tråde; Andet
es: Número de hebras de alambre para cuentas: 1 hilo; 19 hilos; 21 hilos; 24 hilos; 3 hilos; 30 hilos; 49 hilos; 60 hilos; 7 hilos; Otro
hu: Gyöngyfűző drót szálak száma: 1 szálas; 19 szálas; 21 szálas; 24 szálas; 3 szálas; 30 szálas; 49 szálas; 60 szálas; 7 szálas; Egyéb
cs: Počet pramenů korálkovacího lanka: 1 vlákno; 19 vláken; 21 vláken; 24 vláken; 3 vlákna; 30 vláken; 49 vláken; 60 vláken; 7 vláken; Jiné
sv: Antal trådar i pärltråd: 1-trådig; 19-trådig; 21-trådig; 24-trådig; 3-trådig; 30-trådig; 49-trådig; 60-trådig; 7-trådig; Övrigt
it: Conteggio dei fili del filo per perline: 1 filo; 19 fili; 21 fili; 24 fili; 3 fili; 30 fili; 49 fili; 60 fili; 7 fili; Altro
sl-SI: Število žil žice za perlice: 1-žilno; 19-žilno; 21-žilno; 24-žilno; 3-žilno; 30-žilno; 49-žilno; 60-žilno; 7-žilno; Drugo
zh-TW: 串珠線股數: 單股; 19 股; 21 股; 24 股; 3 股; 30 股; 49 股; 60 股; 7 股; 其他
nb: Antall tråder i perletråd: 1-tråds; 19-tråds; 21-tråds; 24-tråds; 3-tråds; 30-tråds; 49-tråds; 60-tråds; 7-tråds; Annet
de: Anzahl der Perlendrahtstränge: 1-strängig; 19-strängig; 21-strängig; 24-strängig; 3-strängig; 30-strängig; 49-strängig; 60-strängig; 7-strängig; Sonstige
tr: Boncuk teli tel sayısı: 1 telli; 19 telli; 21 telli; 24 telli; 3 telli; 30 telli; 49 telli; 60 telli; 7 telli; Diğer
sk-SK: Počet prameňov drôtu na navíjanie korálok: 1-pramenné; 19-pramenné; 21-pramenné; 24-pramenné; 3-pramenné; 30-pramenné; 49-pramenné; 60-pramenné; 7-pramenné; Iné
pl: Liczba splotów drutu do koralików: 1-żyłowy; 19-żyłowy; 21-żyłowy; 24-żyłowy; 3-żyłowy; 30-żyłowy; 49-żyłowy; 60-żyłowy; 7-żyłowy; Inne
ro-RO: Numărul de fire din firul de broderie: 1 fir; 19 fire; 21 fire; 24 fire; 3 fire; 30 fire; 49 fire; 60 fire; 7 fire; Altele
lt-LT: Karoliukų vėrimo vielos gijų skaičius: 1 gijos; 19 gijų; 21 gijos; 24 gijų; 3 gijų; 30 gijų; 49 gijų; 60 gijų; 7 gijų; Kita
nl: Rijgdraad aantal strengen: 1 streng; 19 strengen; 21 strengen; 24 strengen; 3 strengen; 30 strengen; 49 strengen; 60 strengen; 7 strengen; Overige
pt-BR: Número de fios do arame para bijuterias: 1 fio; 19 fios; 21 fios; 24 fios; 3 fios; 30 fios; 49 fios; 60 fios; 7 fios; Outros
el: Αριθμός κλώνων σύρματος για χάντρες: 1 κλώνου; 19 κλώνων; 21 κλώνων; 24 κλώνων; 3 κλώνων; 30 κλώνων; 49 κλώνων; 60 κλώνων; 7 κλώνων; Άλλο
zh-CN: 串珠丝股数: 1 股; 19 股; 21 股; 24 股; 3 股; 30 股; 49 股; 60 股; 7 股; 其他
ru: Количество жил в проволоке для бисероплетения: 1 нить; 19 нитей; 21 нить; 24 нити; 3 нити; 30 нитей; 49 нитей; 60 нитей; 7 нитей; Другое
bg-BG: Брой нишки в телта за работа с мъниста: С 1 нишка; С 19 нишки; С 21 нишки; С 24 нишки; С 3 нишки; С 30 нишки; С 49 нишки; С 60 нишки; С 7 нишки; Друго
en: Beading wire strand count: 1-strand; 19-strand; 21-strand; 24-strand; 3-strand; 30-strand; 49-strand; 60-strand; 7-strand; Other
ko: 비즈 와이어 가닥 수: 1가닥; 19가닥; 21가닥; 24가닥; 3가닥; 30가닥; 49가닥; 60가닥; 7가닥; 기타
pt-PT: Contagem de fios do arame para missangas: 1 fio; 19 fios; 21 fios; 24 fios; 3 fios; 30 fios; 49 fios; 60 fios; 7 fios; Outro
th: จำนวนเส้นลวดที่ถักรวมกันสำหรับร้อยลูกปัด: 1 เส้น; 19 เส้น; 21 เส้น; 24 เส้น; 3 เส้น; 30 เส้น; 49 เส้น; 60 เส้น; 7 เส้น; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Broj žičanih niti za perle: 1 nit; 19 niti; 21 nit; 24 niti; 3 niti; 30 niti; 49 niti; 60 niti; 7 niti; Ostalo
ja: ビーズ用ワイヤーの撚り数: 1本撚り; 19本撚り; 21本撚り; 24本撚り; 3本撚り; 30本撚り; 49本撚り; 60本撚り; 7本撚り; その他